Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 4. Offenses Against the Family

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-4-401.
Bigamy; penalties; defense.

A person commits bigamy if, being married and knowing that his spouse is alive, he marries again.

It is a defense that the accused person reasonably believed that he was eligible to remarry.

Bigamy is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Cross references. —

For provision declaring marriage void when either party has a husband or wife living at the time of contracting, see §

20-2-101

.

Double jeopardy not created by existence of federal law. —

Fact that bigamy was punishable under the laws of the United States did not make the law of a territory punishing it unconstitutional, in that the person committing it would have been subject to two punishments. In re Murphy, 5 Wyo. 297, 40 P. 398,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1895).

Quoted

in

Bowlsby v. State, 2013 WY 72, 302 P.3d 913,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Jun 12, 2013); Bowlsby v. State, 2013 WY 72, 302 P.3d 913,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Jun 12, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Belief in Death of Absent Consort as a Defense to a Charge of Bigamy,” see 10 Wyo. L.J. 158.

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Mistaken belief in existence, validity or effect of divorce or separation as defense for prosecution for adultery, unlawful cohabitation, bigamy or allied offense, 56 ALR2d 915.

Validity of bigamy and polygamy statutes and constitutional provisions, 22 A.L.R.6th 1.

§ 6-4-402.
Incest; penalties; disclosure or publication of identifying information; “minor victim”.

A person is guilty of incest if he knowingly commits sexual intrusion, as defined by W.S. 6-2-301(a)(vii), or sexual contact, as defined by W.S. 6-2-301(a)(vi), with an ancestor or descendant or a brother or sister of the whole or half blood. The relationships referred to herein include relationships of:

Parent and child by adoption;

Blood relationships without regard to legitimacy; and

Stepparent and stepchild.

Incest is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than fifteen (15) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

Prior to the filing of an information or indictment charging a violation under this section, neither the name of the person accused or the victim nor any other information reasonably likely to disclose their identity shall be released or negligently allowed to be released to the public by any public employee, except as authorized by the judge with jurisdiction over the criminal charges. The name of the person accused may be released to the public to aid or facilitate an arrest.

After the filing of an information or indictment and absent a request to release the identity of a minor victim by the victim or another acting on behalf of a minor victim, the trial court shall restrict the disclosure or publication of information reasonably likely to identify the minor victim.

Any person who willfully violates subsection (c) or (d) of this section or who willfully neglects or refuses to obey any court order made pursuant thereto is guilty of contempt and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

A release of a name or other information to the public in violation of the proscriptions of subsection (c) or (d) of this section shall not stand as a bar to the prosecution of a defendant nor be grounds for dismissal of any charges against a defendant.

As used in this section, “minor victim” means a person under the age of eighteen (18) years.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 155, § 3; ch. 171, § 1; 1985, ch. 44, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2005, ch. 129, § 1; 2007, ch. 12, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (c), deleted “or justice” following “authorized by the judge.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (d) to prohibit release of minor victims' names to protect the welfare of the minor child except as specified.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b), substituted “fifteen (15)” for “five (5)” and substituted “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00)” for “five thousand dollars ($5,000.00).

Defendant's conviction, under §

6-2-303

, of sexually assaulting daughters not barred under this section. —

Section

6-2-303

(sexual assault), this section and §

14-3-105

(repealed) (taking indecent liberties with a minor) all concern sexual activities, but one cannot be said to be more specific than the others. Therefore, the defendant's convictions under §§

6-2-303

and

14-3-105

were not barred under this section, even though the victims of his acts were his daughters, ages four and six years. Kallas v. State, 704 P.2d 693,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 525

(Wyo. 1985).

Incest is lesser-included offense of first-degree sexual abuse. —

Defendant's conviction for incest, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-4-402(a)(iii), was a lesser-included offense of the crime of first-degree sexual abuse of a minor, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-314(a)(ii), and constituted the “same offense” under a double jeopardy analysis. Bowlsby v. State, 2013 WY 72, 302 P.3d 913,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2013).

Incest does not merge into second-degree sexual assault. —

The incest statute requires that the sexual contact or intrusion be committed upon a relative of the accused. This family relationship element prevents the incest conviction from merging into the second-degree sexual assault conviction since a family relationship was not a necessary element for the sexual assault. Owen v. State, 902 P.2d 190,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1995), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Admission of testimony regarding defendant's conduct

as described by the victim and her older sister was justified as proof of motive and was sufficiently similar to meet the relevancy requirements of the rules of evidence. Brown v. State, 736 P.2d 1110,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1987).

Consecutive sentences violated double jeopardy provisions against multiple punishments for the same offense,

where the defendant committed two acts of sexual intrusion at the same time and place, and the sentences imposed for those crimes were not required to be merged. Parker v. State, 882 P.2d 1225,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1994).

Applied

in

Young v. State, 678 P.2d 880,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 272

(Wyo. 1984); In re Adoption of RHA, 702 P.2d 1259,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 516

(Wyo. 1985); Craft v. State, 2013 WY 41,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Apr 9, 2013).

Quoted

in

Makinen v. State, 737 P.2d 345,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 448

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Smallwood v. State, 748 P.2d 1141,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1988); Punches v. State, 944 P.2d 1131,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1997); Hodge v. State, 2015 WY 103,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Aug. 12, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Incest by one spouse as a crime against other spouse within statute relating to competency of husband or wife to testify against the other, 11 ALR2d 646.

Consent as element of incest, 36 ALR2d 1299.

Prosecutrix as accomplice or victim, 74 ALR2d 705.

Admissibility, in incest prosecution, of evidence of alleged victim's prior sexual acts with persons other than accused, 97 ALR3d 967.

Emotional or psychological “blocking” or repression as tolling running of statute of limitations, 11 ALR5th 588.

Sexual intercourse between persons related by half blood as incest, 34 ALR5th 723.

§ 6-4-403.
Abandoning or endangering children; penalties; “child”; disclosure or publication of identifying information; “minor victim”.

No parent, guardian or custodian of a child shall:

Abandon the child without just cause; or

Knowingly or with criminal negligence cause, permit or contribute to the endangering of the child’s life or health by violating a duty of care, protection or support.

No person shall knowingly:

Cause, encourage, aid or contribute to a child’s violation of any law of this state;

Cause, encourage, aid or permit a child to enter, remain or be employed in any place or premises used for prostitution or for professional gambling;

Commit any indecent or obscene act in the presence of a child;

Sell, give or otherwise furnish a child any drug prohibited by law without a physician’s prescription;

Conceal or refuse to reveal to the parent, guardian, lawful custodian or to a peace officer the location of a child knowing that the child has run away from a parent, guardian or lawful custodian, except when the action of the defendant is necessary to protect the child from an immediate danger to the child’s welfare; or

Cause, encourage, aid or contribute to the endangering of a child’s health, welfare or morals, by using, employing or permitting a child:

In any business enterprise which is injurious or dangerous to the health, morals, life or physical safety of the child;

In any place for purposes of begging;

To be exhibited for the purpose of displaying any deformity of a child, except to physicians, nurses or other health professionals; or

In a place used for prostitution.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 180, § 3.

A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both. A person convicted of a second violation of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

As used in this section, “child” means a person under the age of sixteen (16) years.

Paragraph (b)(ii) of this section does not apply to crimes chargeable under W.S. 6-4-103(a)(i). Paragraph (b)(iv) of this section does not apply to crimes chargeable under W.S.

35-7-1036

.

Prior to the filing of an information or indictment charging a violation of W.S. 6-4-403(b)(ii), (iii) or (vi)(D), neither the name of the person accused or the victim nor any other information reasonably likely to disclose the identity of the victim shall be released or negligently allowed to be released to the public by any public employee, except as authorized by the judge with jurisdiction over the criminal charges. The name of the person accused may be released to the public to aid or facilitate an arrest.

After the filing of an information or indictment and absent a request to release the identity of a minor victim by the victim or another acting on behalf of a minor victim, the trial court shall restrict the disclosure or publication of information reasonably likely to identify the minor victim.

Any person who willfully violates subsection (f) or (g) of this section or who willfully neglects or refuses to obey any court order made pursuant thereto is guilty of contempt and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

A release of a name or other information to the public in violation of the proscriptions of subsection (f) or (g) of this section shall not stand as a bar to the prosecution of a defendant or be grounds for dismissal of any charges against a defendant.

As used in subsection (g) of this section, “minor victim” means a person under the age of eighteen (18) years.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 155, § 3; ch. 171, § 1; 1985, ch. 44, § 1; 1999, ch. 180, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2005, ch. 129, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

For prohibition against employment of children under 16 years in immoral pursuits, see §

27-6-114

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (f), deleted “or justice” following “authorized by the judge.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (g) to prohibit release of minor victims' names to protect the welfare of the minor child except as specified; and in (k) raised the age defining a minor victim from under sixteen years to under eighteen years.

The 2011 amendment,

redesignated former (b)(vi) and (b)(v) as (b)(v) and (b)(vi); and made related changes.

Laws 2011, ch. 176, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2012 amendment,

in (e), substituted “Paragraph” for “Subsection” twice.

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (f), substituted “W.S. 6-4-403(b)(ii), (iii) or (vi)(D)” for “W.S. 6-4-403(b)(ii), (iii) or (v)(D) or (E).”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Constitutionality. —

Subdivision (a)(ii) of this section is not unconstitutionally vague because it does not enumerate kinds of prohibited conduct; it is necessarily broad to achieve legislative purpose of protecting children against conduct exposing a minor child's life or health to danger, and is sufficiently definite to give notice concerning criminal conduct prohibited. Campbell v. State, 999 P.2d 649,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2000).

Subdivision (a)(ii) of this section was not unconstitutionally vague as applied to mother charged with child endangerment in connection with burn injuries to child, since mother could reasonably understand that delaying eight hours in seeking medical care, or failing to protect child from abusive boyfriend, was prohibited criminal conduct. Campbell v. State, 999 P.2d 649,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2000).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-4-403(b)(iii) was not unconstitutionally vague, U.S. Const. amends. V, XIV, as a determination of what was obscene or indecent was made in the context of the presence of a person of fifteen years or under; the statute was not vague as applied to defendant's conduct.
Dougherty v. State, 2010 WY 127, 239 P.3d 1176,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2010).

Child abuse as lesser-included offense. —

Trial court was not required to give an instruction that child abuse was a lesser-included offense of second-degree murder or manslaughter if the evidence showed that the accused was either guilty or not guilty of the higher grade of the offense. Under certain circumstances, however, child abuse or some related offense, such as assault and battery, could properly be the subject of a lesser-included-offense instruction. Jones v. State, 580 P.2d 1150,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1978).

In a prosecution for second-degree murder, it was not error not to give certain offered instructions on the offense of child abuse where there was no suggestion in the evidence that the cause of death of a child was anything but the burns that she suffered at the residence where she lived with defendant. Abeyta v. State, 592 P.2d 705,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 388

(Wyo. 1979).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in allowing five-year old victim to testify. —

See Smith v. State, 714 P.2d 1201,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 489

(Wyo. 1986).

Jury instruction.—

In a case
involving child endangering/obscene act, there was no error in the
trial court's refusal to admit a proposed jury instruction defining
“presence” after it initially ruled that it would;
the
trial court had first agreed to give the instruction based on
a similar
charge in a companion case that was dismissed because the
alleged
victim was an infant. Delivering the proposed instruction
would not
have helped the jury better do their job. Dougherty v. State, 2016 WY 62, 373 P.3d 427,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2016).

Applied

in

Marshall v. State, 646 P.2d 795,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 346

(Wyo. 1982); Stowe v. State, 2014 WY 97,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Aug 1, 2014).

Quoted

in

In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984); CB v. State, 749 P.2d 267,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1988); Yellowbear v. State, 2008 WY 4, 174 P.3d 1270,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Jan. 14, 2008).

Cited

in

Kruger v. State, 2012 WY 2, 268 P.3d 248,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Jan. 5, 2012).

Law reviews. —

See “Observations and Suggestions Concerning Wyoming Statutes Relating to Adoption Based on Abandonment,” 8 Wyo. L.J. 218.

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For case note, “Evidence — Child Abuse and the Medical Diagnosis or Treatment Exception to the Hearsay Rule. Goldade v. State, 674 P.2d 721,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1983),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 735 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Jurisdiction of courts over custody of child denied medical care by its parent or custodian, 30 ALR2d 1138, 52 ALR3d 1118, 97 ALR3d 421.

Effect of nonresidence of parent or child on jurisdiction and venue of criminal charge for child desertion or nonsupport, 44 ALR2d 886.

Father's criminal liability for desertion of or failure to support child where divorce decree awards custody to another, 73 ALR2d 960.

Criminal liability for excessive or improper punishment inflicted on child by parent, 89 ALR2d 396.

Application, to illegitimate children, of criminal statutes relating to abandonment, neglect and nonsupport of children, 99 ALR2d 746.

Power of court to order medical treatment over parental religious objections for child whose life is not immediately endangered, 52 ALR3d 1118.

Who has custody or control of child within terms of penal statute punishing cruelty or neglect by one having custody or control, 75 ALR3d 933.

Homicide: sufficiency of evidence of mother's neglect of infant born alive, in minutes or hours immediately following unattended birth, to establish culpable homicide, 40 ALR4th 724.

Civil liability for tobacco sales to minors, 55 ALR4th 1238.

Power of court or other public agency to order medical treatment over parental religious objections for child whose life is not immediately endangered, 21 ALR5th 248.

Parents' criminal liability for failure to provide medical attention to their children,118 ALR 5th 253.

§ 6-4-404.
Violation of domestic violence order of protection; penalty.

Any person who willfully violates a protection order issued pursuant to W.S.

35-21-104

or

35-21-105

or valid injunction or order for protection against domestic violence as defined in W.S. 35-21-109(a), is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 97, § 2.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 86, § 1; 1997, ch. 169, § 1; 2000, ch. 54, § 2; 2018 ch. 97, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 97, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “issued pursuant to W.S.

35-1-104

or

35-21-105

or valid injunction or order for protection against domestic violence” for “or valid foreign protection order” preceding “as defined in W.S. 35-21-109(a).”

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 97, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (b) which read: "For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, “protection order” means an order of protection issued pursuant to W.S.

35-21-104

or

35-21-105

or any injunction or other order issued for the purpose of preventing violent or threatening acts or harassment against, or contact or communication with or physical proximity to, another person, including temporary and final orders issued by civil and criminal courts, other than support or child custody orders, whether obtained by filing an independent action or as a pendente lite order in another proceeding so long as any civil order was issued in response to a complaint, petition or motion filed by or on behalf of a person seeking protection."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 97, § 3, provides: “This act shall apply to crimes committed and orders of protection issued on or after the effective date of this act.”

Relation to Stalking. —

Crime of violating a protection order as defined by
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-4-404

is not a lesser-included offense of the crime of stalking as defined by
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-506(b) because the elements of the former simply are not a subset of the elements of the latter.
Snow v. State, 2009 WY 117, 216 P.3d 505,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2009).

Cited

in

Sam v. State, 2008 WY 25, 177 P.3d 1173,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Mar. 6, 2008); Scott v. State, 2012 WY 86, 278 P.3d 747,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(June 18, 2012).

§ 6-4-405.
Endangering children; controlled substances; penalty.

Notwithstanding W.S. 6-4-403(b)(iv), no person shall knowingly and willfully cause or permit any child to:

Absorb, inhale or otherwise ingest any amount of methamphetamine;

Remain in a room, dwelling or vehicle where the person knows methamphetamine is being manufactured or sold; or

Enter and remain in a room, dwelling or vehicle that the person knows is being used to manufacture or store methamphetamines, or the hazardous waste created by the manufacture of methamphetamines.

No person having the care or custody of a child shall knowingly and willfully permit the child to remain in a room, dwelling or vehicle where that person knows that methamphetamine is possessed, stored or ingested.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section is guilty of endangering a child punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 128, § 1; 2012, ch. 98, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

in (c), substituted “subsection” for “subsections.”

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 128, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

Prosecutorial misconduct. —

Even though the prosecutor committed misconduct by incorrectly stating that defendant found the methamphetamine behind a freezer in the garage rather than in the house, defendant was not prejudiced because where defendant found the drugs was irrelevant to a determination of whether he was guilty of violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-4-405(b). Butz v. State, 2007 WY 152, 167 P.3d 650,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2007).

Jury instructions. —

Trial court did not err by failing to give a jury instruction on the definition of “knowingly” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-4-405(b) because reasonable jurors familiar with the English language would understand the instruction in accordance with the ordinary meaning and use of the word.
Butz v. State, 2007 WY 152, 167 P.3d 650,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2007).

In defendant's trial for endangering a child by knowingly and willfully allowing the child to enter and remain in a dwelling where defendant knew methamphetamine was stored in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-4-405(a)(iii), trial court committed plain error in failing to instruct the jury on an essential element of the crime, namely that defendant must have been found to have permitted the child to “enter” the dwelling; because there was some evidence to support defendant's contention that she was not present when the child entered the dwelling, trial court's failure to instruct on the “enter” element of the offense resulted in prejudice to defendant, and defendant was entitled to a new trial.
Granzer v. State, 2008 WY 118, 193 P.3d 266,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2008).

Sufficient evidence. —

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction of endangering his children by knowingly and willfully allowing them to remain in a dwelling where he knew methamphetamine was possessed in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-4-405(b)
because he admitted that he had found the packet of methamphetamine and placed it in a tobacco can, where it was found by police. The evidence also showed that defendant brought his daughters with him to his roommate's house in August 2005 and that they were still in the home when police officers arrived to execute the search warrant,Butz v. State, 2007 WY 152, 167 P.3d 650,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2007).

At defendant's trial on a charge of endangering a child by knowingly and willfully allowing the child to enter and remain in a dwelling where defendant knew methamphetamine was stored, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-4-405(a)(iii), evidence established that methamphetamine was stored in the dwelling; although defendant claimed that evidence only established that methamphetamine located in the house was for her personal use and not storage, when defendant tried to hide a bag of methamphetamine in a recliner, she was without question placing the drugs in a location for preservation or later use.
Granzer v. State, 2008 WY 118, 193 P.3d 266,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2008).

Sufficient evidence supported defendant's child endangerment conviction for knowingly and willfully permitting a child to enter and remain in a dwelling wherein methamphetamine was stored. The jury could have reasonably inferred from defendant's knowledge of the child's presence in the trailer that defendant had at least tacitly given permission for the child to visit and stay with her mother.
Granzer v. State, 2010 WY 130, 239 P.3d 640,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2010).

Merger. —

When appellant was convicted of possession of a controlled substance precursor with the intent to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation, conspiracy to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation, and two counts of child endangerment in violation of this section, appellant was sentenced to terms of six to eight years imprisonment on each of the first two counts, with the two sentences to run concurrently. He was sentenced to terms of eighteen to twenty-four months on each of the last two counts, with these two sentences to run concurrently, but consecutive to the sentences on the first two charges; the district court was not required to merge the different crimes for sentencing under the Blockburger test, because the offenses were different as each required proof of an element that the other did not.
Baker v. State, 2011 WY 123, 260 P.3d 268,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Morris v. State, 2009 WY 88, 210 P.3d 1101,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(July 10, 2009).

Cited

in

Abeyta v. State, 2007 WY 142, 167 P.3d 1,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Sept. 5, 2007).

§ 6-4-406.
Permitting house parties where minors are present; exceptions; penalties.

No person who owns, rents, leases, subleases or has control of any residence or premises shall allow a house party to take place at the residence or premises if any alcoholic liquor, malt beverage or drug prohibited by law to be possessed by a minor is possessed or consumed at the residence or premises by any minor and the person knowingly permitted the residence or premises to be used for that purpose.

The provision of this section shall not apply to:

The furnishing or giving of any alcoholic liquor or malt beverage by an adult to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years, if the recipient is the legal ward, medical patient or member of the immediate family of the adult furnishing or giving the alcoholic liquor or malt beverage;

The consumption, use or possession of a drug pursuant to a lawful prescription issued for the drug;

Religious observance or prescribed medical treatment;

The possession of alcoholic liquor, malt beverage or lawfully prescribed drugs incidental to lawful employment.

Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

For purposes of this section:

“Minor” means as defined in W.S. 8-1-102(a)(iii)(B);

“Premises” includes, but is not limited to, a rented, leased or donated hotel or motel room, a manufactured home or any other public or private facility that is not licensed under chapter 4, title 12 of the Wyoming statutes.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 45, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 45, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.